New York, session 2025-2026, S2239.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 905 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 477 of the laws of 2004, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 4. Vision screening examinations of students in the schools of this 5 state made pursuant to subdivision one of this section, or made pursuant 6 to the by-laws, regulations or practices of the board of education of 7 the city school district of the city of New York, shall be subject to 8 the provisions of this subdivision, and where inconsistent herewith, the 9 provisions of this subdivision shall prevail. In addition to any vision 10 screening examinations otherwise required by the provisions or practices 11 cited in this subdivision, all students who enroll in a school of this 12 state shall be tested for color perception, distance acuity and near 13 vision within six months of admission to the school, or by such other 14 date as may be prescribed in the regulations of the commissioner, using 15 examination devices and testing methods as may be authorized in the 16 regulations of the commissioner, including but not limited to, the Snel- 17 len Eye Test Chart and automated vision screening devices. The results 18 of any such vision screening examinations, whether made pursuant to this 19 subdivision or pursuant to the provisions or practices cited in this 20 subdivision, shall be in writing and shall be made available to the 21 student's parent or person in parental relation and to any teacher of 22 the student within the school while the student is enrolled in the 23 school, and shall be kept in a permanent file of the school for at least 24 as long as the minimum retention period for such records, as prescribed 25 by the commissioner pursuant to article fifty-seven-A of the arts and 26 cultural affairs law. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04203-01-5